test/src/morphology/N-paksja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - пакся: # Ordinary nouns 'field' - full paradigm including MWN
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: пакся
     пакся+N+Gen+Indef: паксянь
     пакся+N+Abl+Indef: паксяда
     пакся+N+Dat+Indef: паксянди
     пакся+N+Abe+Indef: паксяфтома
     пакся+N+Comp+Indef: паксяшка
     пакся+N+Ine+Indef: паксяса
     пакся+N+Ela+Indef: паксяста
     пакся+N+Ill+Indef: паксяс
     пакся+N+Prl+Indef: паксява
     пакся+N+Tra+Indef: паксякс
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: паксязе
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: паксяне
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: паксязень
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: паксянень
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [паксязенди, паксязти]
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: паксяненди
     пакся+N+Abl+PxSg1: паксядон
     пакся+N+Abe+PxSg1: паксяфтомон
     пакся+N+Comp+PxSg1: паксяшкан
     пакся+N+Ine+PxSg1: паксясон
     пакся+N+Ela+PxSg1: паксястон
     пакся+N+Ill+PxSg1: паксязон
     пакся+N+Prl+PxSg1: паксяван
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: паксяце
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: паксятне
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: паксяцень
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: паксятнень
     пакся+N+Abl+PxSg2: паксядот
     пакся+N+Abe+PxSg2: паксяфтомот
     пакся+N+Comp+PxSg2: паксяшкат
     пакся+N+Ine+PxSg2: паксясот
     пакся+N+Ela+PxSg2: паксястот
     пакся+N+Ill+PxSg2: паксязт
     пакся+N+Prl+PxSg2: паксяват
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: паксяц
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: паксянза
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: паксянц
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: паксянзон
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: паксянцты
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: паксянзонды
     пакся+N+Abl+PxSg3: паксядонза
     пакся+N+Abe+PxSg3: паксяфтомонза
     пакся+N+Comp+PxSg3: паксяшканза
     пакся+N+Ine+PxSg3: паксясонза
     пакся+N+Ela+PxSg3: паксястонза
     пакся+N+Ill+PxSg3: паксязонза
     пакся+N+Prl+PxSg3: паксяванза
     пакся+N+Nom+PxPl1: паксяньке
     пакся+N+Gen+PxPl1: паксяньконь
     пакся+N+Dat+PxPl1: паксяньконди
     пакся+N+Abl+PxPl1: паксядонк
     пакся+N+Abe+PxPl1: паксяфтомонк
     пакся+N+Comp+PxPl1: паксяшканк
     пакся+N+Ine+PxPl1: паксясонк
     пакся+N+Ela+PxPl1: паксястонк
     пакся+N+Ill+PxPl1: паксязонк
     пакся+N+Prl+PxPl1: паксяванк
     пакся+N+Nom+PxPl2: паксянте
     пакся+N+Gen+PxPl2: паксянтень
     пакся+N+Dat+PxPl2: паксянтенди
     пакся+N+Abl+PxPl2: паксядонт
     пакся+N+Abe+PxPl2: паксяфтомонт
     пакся+N+Comp+PxPl2: паксяшкант
     пакся+N+Ine+PxPl2: паксясонт
     пакся+N+Ela+PxPl2: паксястонт
     пакся+N+Ill+PxPl2: паксязонт
     пакся+N+Prl+PxPl2: паксявант
     пакся+N+Nom+PxPl3: паксясна
     пакся+N+Gen+PxPl3: паксяснон
     пакся+N+Dat+PxPl3: паксяснонды
     пакся+N+Abl+PxPl3: паксядост
     пакся+N+Abe+PxPl3: паксяфтомост
     пакся+N+Comp+PxPl3: паксяшкаст
     пакся+N+Ine+PxPl3: паксясост
     пакся+N+Ela+PxPl3: паксястост
     пакся+N+Ill+PxPl3: паксязост
     пакся+N+Prl+PxPl3: паксяваст
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: паксят
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Def: паксясь
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+Def: паксять
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+Def: паксяти
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Def: паксятне
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+Def: паксятнень
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+Def: паксятненди    
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: паксявок
     пакся+N+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяньвок
     пакся+N+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: паксядовок
     пакся+N+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяндивок
     пакся+N+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяфтомовок
     пакся+N+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяшкавок
     пакся+N+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: паксясовок
     пакся+N+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: паксястовок
     пакся+N+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: паксясвок
     пакся+N+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: паксявавок
     пакся+N+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: паксяксвок
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксязевок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяневок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксязеньвок
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяненьвок
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [паксязендивок, паксязтивок]
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксянендивок
     пакся+N+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксядонвок
     пакся+N+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяфтомонвок
     пакся+N+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяшканвок
     пакся+N+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксясонвок
     пакся+N+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксястонвок
     пакся+N+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксязонвок
     пакся+N+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: паксяванвок
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяцевок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксятневок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяценьвок
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксятненьвок
     пакся+N+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксядотвок
     пакся+N+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяфтомотвок
     пакся+N+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяшкатвок
     пакся+N+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксясотвок
     пакся+N+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксястотвок
     пакся+N+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксязтвок
     пакся+N+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: паксяватвок
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксяцвок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянзовок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянцвок
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянзонвок
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянцтывок
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксянзондывок
     пакся+N+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксядонзовок
     пакся+N+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксяфтомонзовок
     пакся+N+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксяшканзовок
     пакся+N+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксясонзовок
     пакся+N+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксястонзовок
     пакся+N+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксязонзовок
     пакся+N+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: паксяванзовок
     пакся+N+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксянькевок
     пакся+N+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксянькеньвок
     пакся+N+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксянькендивок
     пакся+N+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксядонквок
     пакся+N+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксяфтомонквок
     пакся+N+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксяшканквок
     пакся+N+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксясонквок
     пакся+N+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксястонквок
     пакся+N+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксязонквок
     пакся+N+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: паксяванквок
     пакся+N+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксянтевок
     пакся+N+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксянтеньвок
     пакся+N+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксянтендивок
     пакся+N+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксядонтвок
     пакся+N+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксяфтомонтвок
     пакся+N+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксяшкантвок
     пакся+N+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксясонтвок
     пакся+N+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксястонтвок
     пакся+N+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксязонтвок
     пакся+N+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: паксявантвок
     пакся+N+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксясновок
     пакся+N+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяснонвок
     пакся+N+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяснондывок
     пакся+N+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксядоствок
     пакся+N+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяфтомоствок
     пакся+N+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяшкаствок
     пакся+N+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксясоствок
     пакся+N+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксястоствок
     пакся+N+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксязоствок
     пакся+N+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: паксяваствок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: паксятвок
     пакся+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: паксясьвок
     пакся+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: паксятьвок
     пакся+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: паксятивок
     пакся+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: паксятневок
     пакся+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: паксятненьвок
     пакся+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: паксятнендивок
